Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.050

Administrator—Discharge of duties.

The administrator for the courts shall be deemed to stand in a fiduciary relationship to the members participating in the plan and shall discharge his or her duties in good faith and with that diligence, care, and skill which ordinary prudent persons would exercise under similar circumstances in like positions.

[ 1988 c 109 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.